AnimHalStem.lexc
!!!nouns.lexc!!!

Multichar_Symbols +N +Anim +Inanim +Indef +Nom +Acc +Dat +GenLoc +InstrAbl +Voc +Sg +Pl +Indef ^GUESSSTEMA ^GUESSSTEMAA ^GUESSSTEMC

LEXICON Root
AnimHalStem;

LEXICON AnimHalStem  				#් is added in rules (මිනිස්)

මිනිස AnimHalNoun;
වලස AnimHalNoun;



LEXICON AnimHalNoun

්+N+Acc+Pl+Anim:්  #;
්+N+Acc+Sg+Anim:ා #;
්+N+Dat+Indef+Sg:ාට #;
්+N+Dat+Indef+Sg:ාටම #;
්+N+GenLoc+Indef+Sg:ෙක් #;
්+N+GenLoc+Indef+Sg:ෙකු #;
්+N+Dat+Pl+Indef:ෙකුට #;
්+N+Dat+Pl+Indef:ෙක්ට #;
්+N+InstrAbl+Pl+Indef:ුන් #;
්+N+InstrAbl+Pl+Indef:්සු #;
්+N+Dat+Pl+Indef:ුන්ට #;
්+N+GenLoc+Pl+Indef:ුන්ගේ #;
්+N+GenLoc+Sg+Anim:ාගේ #;
්+N+GenLoc+Sg+Anim:ාගෙහි #;
්+N+GenLoc+Indef+Sg:ෙක්ගේ #;
්+N+GenLoc+Indef+Sg:ෙකුගේ #;
්+N+InstrAbl+Pl+Indef:ුන්ගෙන් #;
්+N+InstrAbl+Sg+Anim:ාගෙන් #;
්+N+InstrAbl+Indef+Sg:ෙක්ගෙන් #;
්+N+InstrAbl+Indef+Sg:ෙකුගෙන් #;
්+N+Voc+Pl+Indef:ුනි #;
්+N+Acc+Sg+Anim:ාත් #;
්+N+InstrAbl+Pl+Indef:්සුත් #;
්+N+GenLoc+Indef+Sg:ෙකුත් #;
්+N+GenLoc+Pl+Indef:ුන්ගේත් #;
්+N+GenLoc+Sg+Anim:ාගේත් #;
්+N+GenLoc+Indef+Sg:ෙක්ගේත් #;
්+N+GenLoc+Indef+Sg:ෙකුගේත් #;
්+N+Acc+Sg+Anim:ාම #;
